sv: Hjälmstorlekssystem: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS–XXL); Huvudomkrets (cm); Huvudomkrets (tum); Numerisk (t.ex.; One size; Annat
it: Sistema di misurazione del casco: 6 7/8–8 1/2; Alfabetico (XS-XXL); Circonferenza testa (cm); Circonferenza testa (pollici); Numerico (es.; Taglia unica; Altro
hr-HR: Sustav veličina kacige: 6 7/8 – 8 1/2); Slovno (XS – XXL); Opseg glave (cm); Opseg glave (inči); Brojčano (npr.; Univerzalna veličina; Ostalo
ja: ヘルメットサイズシステム: 6 7/8–8 1/2); アルファ (XS-XXL); 頭囲 (cm); 頭囲 (in); 数値 (例:; ワンサイズ; その他
cs: Systém velikostí přileb: 6 7/8 – 8 1/2; Alfa (XS–XXL); Obvod hlavy (cm); Obvod hlavy (in); Číselný (např.; Univerzální velikost; Jiný
de: Helmgrößensystem: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alpha (XS-XXL); Kopfumfang (cm); Kopfumfang (Zoll); Numerisch (z. B.; Einheitsgröße; Andere
fr: Système de taille du casque: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alpha (XS-XXL); Tour de tête (cm); Tour de tête (po); Numérique (par ex.; Taille unique; Autre
en: Helmet size system: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alpha (XS-XXL); Head circumference (cm); Head circumference (in); Numeric (e.g.; One size; Other
es: Sistema de tamaños de cascos: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS-XXL); Circunferencia de la cabeza (cm); Circunferencia de la cabeza (pulgadas); Numérico (p. ej.; Talla única; Otro
sk-SK: Systém veľkostí prilby: 6 7/8 – 8 1/2); Alfabetické (XS – XXL); Obvod hlavy (cm); Obvod hlavy (palce); Číselné (napr.; Univerzálna veľkosť; Iné
sl-SI: Glavni material ali zgradba zunanje školjke, uporabljena za čelado.: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS–XXL); Obseg glave (cm); Obseg glave (v palcih); Številčno (npr.; Ena velikost; Drugo
zh-TW: 頭盔尺寸系統: 6 7/8–8 1/2); 字母 (XS-XXL); 頭圍 (cm); 頭圍 (in); 數字 (例如：; 單一尺寸; 其他
ru: Система размеров шлема: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Буквенная (XS-XXL); Обхват головы (см); Обхват головы (дюймы); Числовая (например,; Единый размер; Другое
ko: 헬멧 사이즈 시스템: 6 7/8–8 1/2); 알파(XS-XXL); 머리 둘레(cm); 머리 둘레(in); 숫자(예:; 원사이즈; 기타
tr: Kask beden sistemi: 6 7/8-8 1/2); Alfabetik (XS-XXL); Baş çevresi (cm); Baş çevresi (inç); Sayısal (ör.; Tek beden; Diğer
el: Σύστημα μεγεθών κράνους: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Αλφαβητικό (XS-XXL); Περίμετρος κεφαλιού (cm); Περίμετρος κεφαλιού (in); Αριθμητικό (π.χ.; Ένα μέγεθος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Sistem de dimensiuni al căștii: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS-XXL); Circumferința capului (cm); Circumferința capului (in); Numeric (de ex.; Mărime universală; Altele
nb: Hjelmstørrelsessystem: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS-XXL); Hodeomkrets (cm); Hodeomkrets (tommer); Numerisk (f.eks.; One size; Annet
vi: Hệ thống kích thước mũ bảo hiểm: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Chữ cái (XS-XXL); Vòng đầu (cm); Vòng đầu (in); Số (vd.; Một cỡ; Khác
pl: System rozmiarów kasku: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Literowy (XS–XXL); Obwód głowy (cm); Obwód głowy (cale); Liczbowy (np.; Jeden rozmiar; Inny
zh-CN: 头盔尺码体系: 6 7/8–8 1/2); 字母 (XS-XXL); 头围 (cm); 头围 (in); 数字（例如; 均码; 其他
th: ระบบขนาดหมวกกันน็อค: 6 7/8–8 1/2); ตัวอักษร (XS-XXL); รอบศีรษะ (ซม.); รอบศีรษะ (นิ้ว); ตัวเลข (เช่น; ขนาดเดียว; อื่นๆ
hu: Sisak méretrendszere: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Betűméretes (XS-XXL); Fejkörfogat (cm); Fejkörfogat (in); Numerikus (pl.; Egyméretes; Egyéb
bg-BG: Система за размери на каската: 6 7/8 – 8 1/2); Буквена (XS – XXL); Обиколка на главата (см); Обиколка на главата (инчове); Цифрова (напр.; Универсален размер; Други
da: Hjelmens størrelsessystem: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS-XXL); Hovedomkreds (cm); Hovedomkreds (tommer); Numerisk (f.eks.; One size; Andet
fi: Kypärän koot: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Kirjainkoko (XS–XXL); Päänympärys (cm); Päänympärys (in); Numeerinen (esim.; Yksi koko; Muu
nl: Helm maat systeem: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS-XXL); Hoofdomtrek (cm); Hoofdomtrek (in); Numeriek (bijv.; Eén maat; Overig
pt-BR: Sistema de tamanho do capacete: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfabético (PP-XGG); Circunferência da cabeça (cm); Circunferência da cabeça (pol.); Numérico (ex.:; Tamanho único; Outros
pt-PT: Tamanho do sistema de capacete: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Alfa (XS-XXL); Perímetro da cabeça (cm); Perímetro da cabeça (pol.); Numérico (p. ex.; Tamanho único; Outro
lt-LT: Šalmo dydžių sistema: 6 7/8–8 1/2); Raidinis (XS–XXL); Galvos apimtis (cm); Galvos apimtis (col.); Skaitmeninis (pvz.,; Vienas dydis; Kita